es: Tamaño de paleta de sombra de ojos: 10 tonos; 12 tonos; 15 tonos; 20+ tonos; 5 tonos; 6 tonos; 8 tonos; Dúo; Cuádruple; Individual; Trío; Otros
nl: Oogschaduwpaletgrootte: 10 kleuren; 12 kleuren; 15 kleuren; 20+ kleuren; 5 kleuren; 6 kleuren; 8 kleuren; Duo; Quad; Enkel; Trio; Andere
th: ขนาดพาเลทอายแชโดว์: 10 ช่อง; 12 ช่อง; 15 ช่อง; 20+ ช่อง; 5 ช่อง; 6 ช่อง; 8 ช่อง; คู่; แบบสี่เกลียว; เดี่ยว; สามสี; อื่นๆ
lt-LT: Akių šešėlių paletės dydis: 10 spalvų; 12 spalvų; 15 spalvų; 20+ spalvų; 5 spalvų; 6 spalvų; 8 spalvų; Dviguba; Quad; Single; Triguба; Kita
it: Taglia della palette di ombretti: 10 cialde; 12 cialde; 15 cialde; 20+ cialde; 5 cialde; 6 cialde; 8 cialde; Duo; Quad; Singolo; Trio; Altro
sk-SK: Veľkosť palety očných tieňov: 10 odtieňov; 12 odtieňov; 15 odtieňov; 20+ odtieňov; 5 odtieňov; 6 odtieňov; 8 odtieňov; Duo; Štvoritý; Jeden; Trio; Iné
fi: Luomiväripaletin koko: 10 väriä; 12 väriä; 15 väriä; 20+ väriä; 5 väriä; 6 väriä; 8 väriä; Kaksikko; Nelimoottorinen; Yksittäinen; Kolmikko; Muu
zh-TW: 眼影盤尺寸: 10 色盤; 12 色盤; 15 色盤; 20+ 色盤; 5 色盤; 6 色盤; 8 色盤; 雙色; 四引擎; 單一; 三色; 其他
bg-BG: Размер на палитрата със сенки за очи: 10 цвята; 12 цвята; 15 цвята; 20+ цвята; 5 цвята; 6 цвята; 8 цвята; Двойка; Четворен; Единично; Тройка; Други
ru: Размер палетки теней для век: 10 оттенков; 12 оттенков; 15 оттенков; 20+ оттенков; 5 оттенков; 6 оттенков; 8 оттенков; Дуо; Четыре; Однократный; Трио; Другой
sl-SI: Velikost palete senčil za oči: 10 odtenkov; 12 odtenkov; 15 odtenkov; 20+ odtenkov; 5 odtenkov; 6 odtenkov; 8 odtenkov; Duo; Štirikolesna; Enojn; Trio; Drugo
cs: Velikost palety očních stínů: 10 stínů; 12 stínů; 15 stínů; 20+ stínů; 5 stínů; 6 stínů; 8 stínů; Duo; Čtyřmotorové; Jednoduché; Trio; Jiné
hr-HR: Veličina palete sjenila: 10 posudica; 12 posudica; 15 posudica; 20+ posudica; 5 posudica; 6 posudica; 8 posudica; Duo; Kvad; Jednostruka; Trio; Ostalo
ko: 아이섀도 팔레트 크기: 10구; 12구; 15구; 20구 이상; 5구; 6구; 8구; 듀오; 쿼드; 싱글; 트리오; 기타
pl: Rozmiar palety cieni do powiek: 10 kolorów; 12 kolorów; 15 kolorów; 20+ kolorów; 5 kolorów; 6 kolorów; 8 kolorów; Duo; Quad; Pojedynczy; Trio; Inne
nb: Øyenskyggepalettstørrelse: 10 farger; 12 farger; 15 farger; 20+ farger; 5 farger; 6 farger; 8 farger; Duo; Quad; Enkel; Trio; Annet
en: Eye shadow palette size: 10 pan; 12 pan; 15 pan; 20+ pan; 5 pan; 6 pan; 8 pan; Duo; Quad; Single; Trio; Other
sv: Ögonskuggapalettstorlek: 10-palett; 12-palett; 15-palett; 20+ palett; 5-palett; 6-palett; 8-palett; Duo; fyrhjuling; Enkel; Trio; Övrigt
pt-BR: Tamanho da paleta de sombras: 10 cores; 12 cores; 15 cores; 20+ cores; 5 cores; 6 cores; 8 cores; Duo; Quádrupla; Único; Trio; Outro
vi: Kích thước bảng phấn mắt: 10 ô; 12 ô; 15 ô; 20+ ô; 5 ô; 6 ô; 8 ô; Đôi; Bốn; Đơn; Ba; Khác
ro-RO: Dimensiunea paletei de farduri de pleoape: 10 culori; 12 culori; 15 culori; 20+ culori; 5 culori; 6 culori; 8 culori; Duo; Quad; Simplu; Trio; Altele
fr: Taille de la palette de fards à paupières: 10 godets; 12 godets; 15 godets; 20+ godets; 5 godets; 6 godets; 8 godets; Duo; Quadruplé; Unique; Trio; Autre
el: Μέγεθος παλέτας σκιών ματιών: Παλέτα 10 χρωμάτων; Παλέτα 12 χρωμάτων; Παλέτα 15 χρωμάτων; Παλέτα 20+ χρωμάτων; Παλέτα 5 χρωμάτων; Παλέτα 6 χρωμάτων; Παλέτα 8 χρωμάτων; Διπλή; Τετραπλό; Μονό; Τριπλή; Άλλο
de: Lidschatten-Palettengröße: 10 Pfannen; 12 Pfannen; 15 Pfannen; 20+ Pfannen; 5 Pfannen; 6 Pfannen; 8 Pfannen; Duo; Vierstrahlig; Einstrahlig; Trio; Sonstiges
da: Størrelse på øjenskyggepalette: 10 farver; 12 farver; 15 farver; 20+ farver; 5 farver; 6 farver; 8 farver; Duo; Firdobbelt; Enkelt; Trio; Andet
zh-CN: 眼影盘大小: 10 色盘; 12 色盘; 15 色盘; 20 色以上盘; 5 色盘; 6 色盘; 8 色盘; 双色; 四倍; 单仓; 三色; 其他
tr: Göz farı paleti boyutu: 10 gözlü; 12 gözlü; 15 gözlü; 20+ gözlü; 5 gözlü; 6 gözlü; 8 gözlü; İkili; Dört; Tek; Üçlü; Diğer
hu: Szemhéjpúder-paletta mérete: 10 színes; 12 színes; 15 színes; 20+ színes; 5 színes; 6 színes; 8 színes; Kettős; Négyes; Szimpla; Hármas; Egyéb
ja: アイシャドウパレットサイズ: 10色パレット; 12色パレット; 15色パレット; 20色以上パレット; 5色パレット; 6色パレット; 8色パレット; デュオ; クアッド; シングル; トリオ; その他
pt-PT: Tamanho da paleta de sombras: 10 cores; 12 cores; 15 cores; 20+ cores; 5 cores; 6 cores; 8 cores; Duo; Quádruplo; Único; Trio; Outro